Mississippi, session 2026, HB600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of Rust College for the purpose of establishing two (2) new academic programs and to assist in paying costs associated with completion of renovation work on residential facility Gross Hall, as provided in Section 2 of this act, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.... $2,025,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be used by the board of trustees as follows: (a)  Establishing a dual degree program in engineering and a film studies program................................. $750,000.00 (b)  Completion of renovation work on residential facility Gross Hall........................................ $1,300,000.00 TOTAL............................................. $2,025,000.00 SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.